Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8205
Advanced level trauma center, defined.

Advanced level trauma center means a trauma center which, in addition to providing all of the services provided by basic level and general level trauma centers, also provides definitive care for complex and severe trauma, an emergency trauma team available within fifteen minutes, twenty-four hours per day, inhouse operating room personnel who initiate surgery, a neurosurgeon available who provides neurological assessment and stabilization, a broad range of specialists available for consultation or care, comprehensive diagnostic capabilities and support equipment, and appropriate equipment for pediatric trauma patients in the emergency department, intensive care unit, and operating room.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 88.